Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.440

Island library districts—Powers and limitations for indebtedness.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, island library districts and the trustees thereof shall have the same powers and limitations as are prescribed by RCW 27.12.060 through 27.12.070 for rural county library districts and shall follow the same procedures and be subject to the same limitations as are provided therein with respect to the contracting of indebtedness.

[ 1982 c 123 s 5.]